trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
    <pardef n="CM_fondre">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fondre</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fondre</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonent</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonent</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonc</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fons</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fon</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fone</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pi2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>foni</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ii1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>foní</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fondr</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="FutInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_fut"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguí</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguer</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pp1"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongué</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguér</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="IndefInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongu</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_ps_or"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongu</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="PresSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl1i2"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongué</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_és"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongue</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="ImpSubj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_impsbj_es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fondr</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="CondInd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_cond"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fon</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongui</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguem</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>foneu</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguin</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fon</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fongui</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_vocal"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguem</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>foneu</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fonguin</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="Imperatiu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_enclitics_cons"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="CM_FONDRE">
      <e>
        <par n="CM_fondre"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fós</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/><s n="masc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fos</l>
          <r>fondre<s n="verb"/><s n="partpi"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="CM_pl_femS"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>di</i>
        <par n="CM_FONDRE"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="CM_fondre"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>re</i>
        <par n="CM_FONDRE"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>con</i>
        <par n="CM_FONDRE"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>in</i>
        <par n="CM_FONDRE"/>
      </e>
